District of Columbia statutes.
46-251.10

Sanctions; limitations on liability.

(a)

An employer shall not discharge, refuse to employ, or take disciplinary action against a parent or employee based on the parent or employee’s obligation to provide health insurance coverage for a child under a medical support notice or a support order.

(b)

There shall be a rebuttable presumption that an employer who engages in conduct described in subsection (a) of this section, within 90 days from the date of receipt of the medical support notice or the support order, is in violation of this section and may be subject to the sanctions in subsection (c) of this section.

(c)

Any employer who engages in conduct described in subsection (a) of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to $10,000. An employee, a parent, or the IV-D agency may bring a civil action against an employer who violates subsection (a) of this section. A civil penalty obtained under this section shall be used to offset the employee’s duty of support.

(d)

If an employer fails to withhold an employee contribution for health insurance coverage or fails to send a withheld contribution to the health insurer as required by § 46-251.08, a judgment shall be entered against the employer for the amount not withheld or paid to the health insurer, and for any reasonable counsel fees and court costs incurred by the employee, a parent, the health insurer, or the IV-D agency as a result of the failure to withhold or make payment.

(e)

An employer shall be liable for unreimbursed health care expenses incurred by or on behalf of a child as a result of the employer’s failure to comply with the requirements of this subchapter or § 1-307.42.

(f)

A health insurer shall be liable for unreimbursed health care expenses incurred by or on behalf of a child as a result of the health insurer’s failure to comply with the requirements of this subchapter or § 1-307.41.

(g)

Neither an employer nor a health insurer shall be subject to liability under subsections (d), (e), or (f) of this section if the employer or health insurer proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the failure to comply was due to exigent circumstances beyond the control of the employer or health insurer.

(h)

Neither an employer nor a health insurer who complies, in accordance with the requirements of this subchapter, with a medical support notice or a support order that is regular on its face shall be subject to civil liability to an individual or entity for conduct in compliance with the medical support notice or support order.

History

Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-130, § 110, 51 DCR 1615

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-251.03.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 110 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-238, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2751).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 110 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-84, March 10, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3376).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 110 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-485, October 3, 2002, 49 DCR 9631).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 110 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-600, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 664).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 110 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-208, October 24, 2003, 50 DCR 9856).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 110 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-330, January 28, 2004, 51 DCR 1603).